District of Columbia statutes.
9-1207.05

Liability of railroad companies for injuries.

The said railroad companies shall be liable for any accident to, or injuries sustained by, any person by reason of any act or omission of the railroad companies or by their agents or servants during the construction, installation, maintenance, or operation of the electrical equipment and apparatus of the railroad trains.

History

Mar. 27, 1934, 48 Stat. 507, ch. 97, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1434.
1973 Ed., § 7-1234.